Georgia, session 2025_26, HB477.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 9 of Title 33 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to regulation of
rates, underwriting rules, and related organizations, is amended by revising paragraph (2) of
Code Section 33-9-4, relating to standards applicable to making and use of rates, as follows:
"(2) No rate shall be held to be excessive unless such rate is unreasonably high for the
insurance provided and a reasonable degree of competition does not exist in the area with
respect to the classification to which such rate is applicable; provided, however, that, with
respect to rate filings involving an increase in rates, no rate for personal private passenger
motor vehicle insurance shall be held to be excessive unless such rate is unreasonably
high for the insurance provided and a reasonable degree of competition does not exist.
H. B. 477
- 1 -

LC 46 1041
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, no insurer in this state shall raise
rates on a private passenger motor vehicle insurance policy more often than once every
calendar year;"
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2026, and shall apply to all policies issued,
delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state on or after such date.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 477
- 2 -